Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

Board of Funeral Directors and Embalmers

62-5-201. Creation — Appointment and terms of members.

There is created a state board to be known and designated as the board of funeral directors and embalmers for this state. The board shall consist of seven (7) members who shall possess good moral character, shall be residents of the state and shall be appointed by the governor. Four (4) of the members shall be licensed as both funeral directors and embalmers and two (2) of the members shall be licensed as funeral directors, embalmers, or both, all of whom shall possess a minimum of five (5) consecutive years' experience in this state immediately preceding their appointment. At least one (1) member may be appointed from lists of qualified nominees submitted by interested funeral director and embalmer groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Funeral Directors Association. At least one (1) member may be appointed from lists of qualified nominees submitted by interested funeral director and mortician groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee State Funeral Directors and Morticians Association. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions. One (1) of the seven (7) members serving on the board shall be a person who is not engaged in the business of a funeral director or embalmer or otherwise commercially associated with any funeral establishment. There shall be at least two (2) members but no more than three (3) members from each grand division. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

On January 1 of each year, the governor shall appoint a person who shall serve as a member of the board for a period of four (4) years or until a successor is appointed and qualified. It is the purpose of this section that at least one (1) member shall retire from the board at the end of each year, thereby creating a rotating board.

A member of the board shall not be eligible for at least one (1) term for reappointment to membership on the board.

Vacancies occurring on the board shall be filled in accordance with this section for the balance of the unexpired term.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 3 (Williams, § 7140.3); Acts 1959, ch. 314, § 1; 1980, ch. 554, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-502; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 29; 1991, ch. 284, § 1; 2012, ch. 694, § 1; 2015, ch. 161, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The board of funeral directors and embalmers, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-245.

The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance for purposes of administration, see §§ 4-3-1304, 56-1-301 — 56-1-306.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of the State of Tennessee, Acts 2015, ch. 161 became effective April 17, 2015.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

62-5-202. Oath of members.

Members of the board, before entering upon their duties, shall take and subscribe to the oath of office provided for state officers.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 4 (Williams, § 7140.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-503.

62-5-203. President — Rules and regulations.

The board has the power to select from its members a president and vice president, to adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations to effectuate this chapter, to transact its business, and to establish standards of service, practice, and education for licensees, consistent with the laws of this state.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 4 (Williams, § 7140.4); Acts 1967, ch. 372, § 1; 1973, ch. 37, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(103); 1978, ch. 906, § 16; 1980, ch. 554, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-504; Acts 2014, ch. 690, § 1.

62-5-204. [Reserved.]

The director of the division of regulatory boards or the director's designee shall serve as executive director for the board and shall provide all administrative functions for the board.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 4 (Williams, § 7140.4); Acts 1967, ch. 372, § 2; 1975, ch. 236, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 17; 1978, ch. 924, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-505; Acts 1996, ch. 742, § 1.

62-5-206. Meetings — Quorum.

The board may hold meetings that it may deem necessary; provided, that all members have been notified in writing of the meetings and may transact any business at any such meeting.

Four (4) or more members shall comprise a quorum authorizing the board to transact the business prescribed under this chapter.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 5 (Williams, § 7140.5); Acts 1975, ch. 165, § 9; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(103); 1978, ch. 906, § 18; 1980, ch. 554, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-506; Acts 1999, ch. 20, § 1.

62-5-207. Revenues and expenses.

All fees, penalties and other moneys derived from the operation of this chapter shall be paid to the board and shall be used by it for the purpose of defraying the necessary expenses of the board in the administration of this chapter.

The moneys received by the board over and above the expenses of the board shall be paid into the state treasury.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 22 (Williams, § 7140.22); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-507.

62-5-208. Power to conduct inspections and investigate complaints.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule to the contrary, the board is authorized to conduct inspections and investigate complaints to enforce this chapter.

The board, utilizing an authorized representative licensed as a funeral director and embalmer, shall:

Inspect a funeral establishment making application to the board for initial licensure, change of ownership, or change of location, prior to approving the application; provided, if the establishment to be inspected is a crematory facility, the authorized representative shall also be certified as a crematory operator; and

Conduct an unannounced inspection of every funeral establishment each year. The following provisions apply to inspections required by this subdivision (b)(2):

Inspections shall be conducted on weekdays between the hours of eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and four-thirty p.m. (4:30 p.m.);

Inspections shall be limited in scope to items in an inspection checklist that shall be published on the board's website; provided, that violations of other items that are plainly visible may be documented; and

If a funeral establishment is unable to participate due to factors not reasonably within its control, the authorized representative may defer the inspection, or a portion thereof, and the funeral establishment shall not incur a reinspection fee.

During the course of inspections, reasonable care shall be used to avoid disruption to invitees being served by the funeral establishment.

A licensee shall not unreasonably fail to cooperate with an authorized representative acting in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2014, ch. 690, § 2; 2015, ch. 161, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of the State of Tennessee, Acts 2015, ch. 161 became effective April 17, 2015.